Missouri, session 2026, HB2682.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 160.2500, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 160.2500, to read as follows:
160.2500. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri [Student
Religious Liberties] Safeguarding Personal Expression at K-12 Schools (SPEAKS) Act".
2. A public school district shall not discriminate against any person on the basis of a
religious, political, or ideological viewpoint or religious, political, or ideological
expression. A school district shall treat a student's voluntary expression of a religious,
political, or ideological viewpoint, if any, on an otherwise permissible subject in the same
manner the district treats a student's voluntary expression of a secular or other viewpoint on
an otherwise permissible subject and shall not discriminate against the student based on a
religious, political, or ideological viewpoint expressed by the student on an otherwise
permissible subject.
3. Students in public schools may express their religious, political, or ideological
beliefs [about religion] in homework, artwork, and other written and oral assignments free
from discrimination based on the religious, political, or ideological content of their
submissions. Homework and classroom assignments shall be judged by ordinary academic
standards of substance and relevance and against other legitimate pedagogical concerns
identified by the school district. Students shall not be penalized or rewarded on account of
the religious, political, or ideological content of their work. If an assignment requires a
student's viewpoints to be expressed in course work, artwork or other written or oral
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2682 2
assignments, a public school district shall not penalize or reward a student on the basis of
religious, political, or ideological content or a religious, political, or ideological viewpoint.
In such an assignment, a student's academic work that expresses a religious, political, or
ideological viewpoint shall be evaluated based on ordinary academic standards of substance
and relevance to the course curriculum or requirements of the course work or assignment.
4. Students in public schools may pray or engage in religious, political, or
ideologicalactivities or religious, political, or ideologicalexpression before, during and after
the school day in the same manner and to the same extent that students may engage in
[nonreligious] other activities or expression, provided that such religious, political, or
ideological expression or religious, political, or ideological activities are not disruptive of
scheduled instructional time or other educational activities and do not impede access to
school facilities or mobility on school premises. Students may organize prayer groups[,];
religious, political, or ideological clubs[,]; or other religious, political, or ideological
gatherings before, during and after school to the same extent that students are permitted to
organize other noncurricular student activities and groups. Religious, political, or
ideological groups shall be given the same access to school facilities for assembling as is
given to other noncurricular groups without discrimination based on the religious, political,
or ideological content of the student's expression. If student groups that meet for
nonreligious activities are permitted to advertise or announce meetings of the groups, the
school district shall not discriminate against groups that meet for prayer or other religious,
political, or ideological speech. A school district may disclaim school sponsorship of
noncurricular groups and events in a manner that neither favors nor disfavors groups that
meet to engage in prayer or religious, political, or ideological speech.
5. A public school shall not discriminate against a student club because of:
(1) The religious, political, or ideological viewpoints expressed by the students or
the organization; or
(2) Any requirement that the leaders or members of the club affirm and adhere
to the organization's sincerely held beliefs, comply with the organization's standards of
conduct, or further the organization's mission or purpose, as defined by the student
organization.
6. Students in public schools may wear clothing, accessories and jewelry that display
religious, political, or ideological messages or religious, political, or ideological symbols in
the same manner and to the same extent that other types of clothing, accessories and jewelry
that display messages or symbols are permitted, as specified in subsection 7 of section
167.166.
[6.] 7. (1) To ensure that the school district does not discriminate against a student's
publicly stated voluntary expression of a religious, political, or ideological viewpoint, if any,

HCS HB 2682 3
and to eliminate any actual or perceived affirmative school sponsorship or attribution to the
district of a student's expression of a religious, political, or ideological viewpoint, if any, a
school district shall adopt a policy, which shall include the establishment of a limited public
forum for student speakers at all school events at which a student is to publicly speak. The
policy regarding the limited public forum shall also require the school district to:
(a) Provide the forum in a manner that does not discriminate against a student's
voluntary expression of a religious, political, or ideological viewpoint, if any, on an
otherwise permissible subject;
(b) Provide a method, based on neutral criteria, for the selection of student speakers at
school events and graduation ceremonies;
(c) Ensure that a student speaker does not engage in obscene, vulgar, offensively lewd
or indecent speech; and
(d) State, in writing, orally, or both, that the student's speech does not reflect the
endorsement, sponsorship, position or expression of the district.
(2) The school district disclaimer required by paragraph (d) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall be provided at all graduation ceremonies. The school district shall also
continue to provide the disclaimer at any other event in which a student speaks publicly for as
long as a need exists to dispel confusion over the district's nonsponsorship of the student's
speech.
(3) Student expression on an otherwise permissible subject shall not be excluded from
the limited public forum because the subject is expressed from a religious, political, or
ideological viewpoint.
(4) All public school districts shall adopt and implement a local policy regarding a
limited public forum and voluntary student expression of religious, political, or ideological
viewpoints.
[7.] 8. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to authorize this state or
any of its political subdivisions to either:
(1) Require any person to participate in prayer or in any other religious, political, or
ideological activity; or
(2) Violate the constitutional rights of any person.
[8.] 9. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the authority of
any public school to do any of the following:
(1) Maintain order and discipline on the campus of the public school in a content and
viewpoint neutral manner;
(2) Protect the safety of students, employees and visitors of the public school;

HCS HB 2682 4
(3) Adopt and enforce policies and procedures regarding student speech at school,
provided that the policies and procedures do not violate the rights of students as guaranteed
by law.
10. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the authority of
any public school to prohibit, limit, or restrict any of the following:
(1) Expression that the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States
does not protect, such as true threats, obscenity, or expression directed to provoke
imminent lawless actions and likely to produce such actions;
(2) Expression that is unwelcome and so severe, pervasive, and subjectively and
100 objectively offensive that a student is effectively denied equal access to educational
101 opportunities or benefits provided by the school; or
102 (3) Conduct that intentionally, materially, and substantially disrupts:
103 (a) The operations of the school; or
104 (b) The expressive activity of another individual if that activity is occurring in a
105 campus space reserved for that activity under the exclusive use or control of a particular
106 student, group of students, or club.
107 11. Any person or student organization who is harmed by a violation of this
108 section or whose rights under this section are violated shall have a private cause of
109 action against the public school for declaratory and injunctive relief, monetary
110 damages, reasonable attorney's fees and costs, and any other appropriate relief. A
111 person or student organization shall be required to bring suit for violation of this section
112 not later than two years after the day the cause of action accrues. For purposes of
113 calculating the two-year limitation period, each day that the violation persists and each
114 day that a policy in violation of this section remains in effect shall constitute a new day
115 that the cause of action has accrued. If a court should find a violation of this section, it
116 shall issue an award to the prevailing party of at least five thousand dollars.
117 12. Any person or student organization aggrieved by a violation of this section
118 may assert such violation as a defense or counterclaim in any disciplinary action or in
119 any civil or administrative proceeding brought against such person or student
120 organization.
121 13. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any other remedies
122 available to any student or student organization.
123 14. The state waives immunity and consents to be sued in federal court for
124 claims relating to public schools arising under this section. A public school that violates
125 this section is not immune from suit or liability for the violation.

HCS HB 2682 5
126 [9.] 15. The provisions of section 1.140 are applicable to this section.
✔